Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 5. Campaign Practices

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d Associations and Clubs § 1.

§ 22-29-501.
Political action committees.

As used in this section:

“Political action committee” means any group of two (2) or more persons organized and associated for the purpose of raising, collecting or spending money for the support or opposition to any special district ballot proposition;

“Special district ballot proposition” means any election conducted under a principal act or this act, but excluding director elections.

A political action committee shall file a statement of formation within ten (10) business days after formation. The chairman and treasurer of a committee shall be separate individuals. The statement of formation shall list the name and mailing address of the committee, name and address of the committee chairman and treasurer, date the committee was formed and the purpose of the committee. The statement of formation shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which the district is located or is to be located.

No organization of any kind including a corporation, partnership, trade union, professional association or civic, fraternal or religious group or other profit or nonprofit entity except a political action committee, directly or indirectly through any officer, member, director or employee, shall contribute funds, other items of value or election assistance to aid or promote the interests, success or defeat of any special district ballot proposition. No person shall solicit or receive a payment or contribution from an organization prohibited from making contributions under this subsection.

The secretary of state shall prescribe and furnish the forms for reporting contributions and expenditures for special district ballot proposition elections together with written instructions for completing the form and a warning that violators are subject to civil and criminal charges. The forms along with instructions and warning shall be distributed to the county clerk and shall be given by the county clerk to each political action committee upon formation.

Every political action committee shall file a fully itemized statement of contributions and expenditures within ten (10) business days after any special district ballot proposition election. The statement shall set forth the full and complete record of contributions including cash, goods or services and of actual and promised expenditures, including all identifiable expenses as set forth in W.S.

22-25-103

. The date of each contribution of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more, any expenditure or obligation, the name of the person from whom received or to whom paid and the purpose of each expenditure or obligation shall be listed. All contributions under twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be reported but need not be itemized. Should the accumulation of contributions from an individual exceed the twenty-five dollar ($25.00) threshold, all contributions from that individual shall be itemized.

It is unlawful for a political action committee to pay for campaign literature or campaign advertising without displaying or speaking a disclosure in accordance with W.S.

22-25-110

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “contributions” for “receipts” in (d) and (e).

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “ten (10) business days” for “ten (10) days” in the first sentence in (b) and the first sentence in (e).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote (f) which read: "It is unlawful for a political action committee to pay for campaign literature or campaign advertising in any communication medium without printing or announcing the committee sponsoring the campaign advertising or campaign literature. The communications media in using the campaign advertising shall print or announce the name of the committee paying for the advertising."